Florida, session 2026, HB429.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsections (6), (7), and (8) of section
874.03, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (7),
(8), and (9), respectively, subsection (3) of that section is
amended, and a new subsection (6) is added to that section, to
read:
874.03 Definitions.—As used in this chapter:
(3) "Criminal gang member" means is a person who meets two
or more of the following criteria:
(a) Admits in person or on an online platform or social
media that he or she is a criminal gang member.
(b)(a) Is identified or claimed by a Admits to criminal
gang as one of its members membership.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb429 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 429 2026 Legislature
(c)(b) Is identified as a criminal gang member by a
parent, or guardian, or spouse living with the person.
(d)(c) Is identified as a criminal gang member by a
documented reliable informant.
(e)(d) Adopts the style of dress of a criminal gang.
(f)(e) Adopts the use of a hand sign identified as used by
a criminal gang.
(g)(f) Has a tattoo identified as used by a criminal gang.
(h)(g) Associates with one or more known criminal gang
members.
(i)(h) Is identified as a criminal gang member by an
informant of previously untested reliability and such
identification is corroborated by independent information.
(j)(i) Is identified as a criminal gang member by physical
evidence.
(k)(j) Has been observed in the company of one or more
known criminal gang members two four or more times. Observation
in a custodial setting requires a willful association. It is the
intent of the Legislature to allow this criterion to be used to
identify gang members who recruit and organize in jails,
prisons, and other detention settings.
(l)(k) Has authored any communication indicating gang
affiliation or gang activity or accepting responsibility for the
commission of any crime by a the criminal gang member.
(m) Uses gang-related language in furtherance of criminal
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb429 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 429 2026 Legislature
gang-related activity on an online platform or social media.

Where a single act or factual transaction satisfies the
requirements of more than one of the criteria in this
subsection, each of those criteria has thereby been satisfied
for the purposes of this subsection the statute.
(6) "Gang-related language" means any verbal or written
statement that signals gang affiliation, supports gang activity,
or uses recognized gang codes, symbols, or terminology
associated with criminal organizations. Written statements
include any digital or electronic statements, including
statements made on any online platform or social media.
Section 2. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
made by this act to section 874.03, Florida Statutes, in a
reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section
823.05, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
823.05 Places and groups engaged in certain activities
declared a nuisance; abatement and enjoinment.—
(2)(a) As used in this subsection, the terms "criminal
gang," "criminal gang member," "criminal gang associate," and
"criminal gang-related activity" have the same meanings as
provided in s. 874.03.
Section 3. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
made by this act to section 874.03, Florida Statutes, in a
reference thereto, paragraph (n) of subsection (6) of section
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb429 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 429 2026 Legislature
921.141, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
921.141 Sentence of death or life imprisonment for capital
felonies; further proceedings to determine sentence.—
(6) AGGRAVATING FACTORS.—Aggravating factors shall be
limited to the following:
(n) The capital felony was committed by a criminal gang
member, as defined in s. 874.03.
Section 4. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
made by this act to section 874.03, Florida Statutes, in a
reference thereto, subsection (11) of section 951.23, Florida
Statutes, is reenacted to read:
951.23 County and municipal detention facilities;
definitions; administration; standards and requirements.—
(11) GANG STATUS OF INMATES.—A county or municipal
detention facility may designate an individual to be responsible
for assessing whether each current inmate is a criminal gang
member or associate using the criteria in s. 874.03. The
individual should at least once biweekly transmit information on
inmates believed to be criminal gang members or associates to
the arresting law enforcement agency.
Section 5. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb429 -01-er